Tennessee, session 114, HB2417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-12-105(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "two (2) days'" and substituting "three (3) days'".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2417
012767
- 1 -